Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2307
Emergency condition, defined.

Emergency condition shall mean any condition which constitutes a clear and present danger to life, health, or property or which demands immediate action to prevent or repair a major service outage.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 7.